Florida, session 2026, HB6507.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
174
175 Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6507 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S

ENROLLED
HB 6507 2026 Legislature
176 are found and declared to be true.
177 Section 2. The sum of $3.8 million is appropriated from
178 the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Children and
179 Families for the relief of L.E. for injuries and damages
180 sustained as a result of the negligence of the department.
181 Section 3. The Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw
182 a warrant in favor of L.E., payable to the irrevocable trust
183 which has already been created for the exclusive use and benefit
184 of L.E., in the sum of $3.8 million upon funds of the Department
185 of Children and Families in the State Treasury and to pay the
186 same out of such funds in the State Treasury.
187 Section 4. The amount paid by the Department of Children
188 and Families pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the
189 amount awarded under this act are intended to provide the sole
190 compensation for all present and future claims against the
191 department arising out of the factual situation described in
192 this act which resulted in injuries and damages to L.E. The
193 total amount paid for attorney fees relating to this claim
194 against the department may not exceed 25 percent of the total
195 amount awarded under this act.
196 Section 5. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6507 -00-er